Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2728.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6187YH (4) 91 as/js H.F. 2728 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 719.1B Obstructing first responder 1 after warning. 2 1. As used in this section: 3 a. âFirst responderâ means a law enforcement officer, a 4 probation or parole officer, a fire fighter, or an emergency 5 medical care provider. 6 b. âHarassâ means to willfully engage in a course of 7 conduct directed at a first responder that intentionally causes 8 substantial emotional distress in the first responder and 9 serves no legitimate purpose. 10 2. a. A person shall not, after receiving a verbal 11 warning not to approach from an individual the person knows or 12 reasonably should know is a first responder who is engaged in 13 the lawful performance of a legal duty, knowingly and willfully 14 violate the warning and approach or remain within twenty-five 15 feet of the first responder with the intent to do any of the 16 following: 17 (1) Impede or interfere with the first responderâs ability 18 to perform the first responderâs duty. 19 (2) Threaten the first responder with physical harm. 20 (3) Harass the first responder. 21 b. A person who violates this section commits a serious 22 misdemeanor. 23